Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2169.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-45.1 of the General Laws entitled "Career and Technical
Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-45.1-4. Participation by students in training activities at the Rhode Island fire
academy.
(a) Effective July 1, 2026, students enrolled in an appropriately credentialed career and
technical education program in the areas of emergency medicine technician, firefighting, or public
safety (hereinafter collectively referred to as the “program”) including, but not limited to, students
under the age of eighteen (18) years, shall be eligible to participate in training activities at the Rhode
Island fire academy. The Rhode Island fire academy, in conjunction with the department of health,
the department of education, and the career and technical board of trustees, shall establish
guidelines and benchmarks a student shall meet within and, if appropriate, outside of the program,
in order to be eligible to participate in these training activities. Provided, as a prerequisite, a student
shall be deemed fit to participate in these training activities by both the student’s sending district
and the fire academy.
(b)(1) Effective July 1, 2026, students who successfully complete an appropriately
credentialed career and technical education program as described in subsection (a) of this section
may take the exams and skills testing for the following certifications:
(i) Hazardous materials awareness;

(ii) Firefighter I; and
(iii) Firefighter II.
(2) The fire education and training coordinating board established pursuant to § 23-28.2-
23 is authorized to promulgate any rules or regulations the board deems necessary to ensure
students are properly trained and fit to undertake the exams and skills testing for the certifications
referenced in this subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC003879
========
LC003879 - Page 2 of 3